Idaho, session 2026, H0531.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-520, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-520. POLICY GOVERNING MEDICAL INHALERS, EPINEPHRINE AUTO-INJEC-
TORS DELIVERY SYSTEMS, INSULIN AND BLOOD GLUCOSE MONITORING SUPPLIES. (1)
The board of trustees of each school district, including charter districts,
shall adopt a policy permitting the self-administration of medication ad-
ministered by way of a metered-dose inhaler by a pupil for asthma or other po-
tentially life-threatening respiratory illness or by way of an epinephrine
auto-injector delivery system for severe allergic reaction (anaphylaxis).
On or before September 1, 2016, such boards of trustees shall also adopt a
policy permitting the self-administration of diabetes medication and blood
glucose monitoring by a pupil with diabetes.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Medication" means an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system, a
metered-dose inhaler or a dry powder inhaler or insulin prescribed by a
physician and having an individual label; and
(b) "Self-administration" means a student's use of medication or of
blood glucose monitoring supplies pursuant to prescription or written
direction from a physician.
(3) A student who is permitted to self-administer medication or blood
glucose monitoring pursuant to this section shall be permitted to possess
and use a prescribed inhaler, an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system,
insulin or blood glucose monitoring supplies at all times.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a school dis-
trict from requiring pupils to maintain current duplicate prescription med-
ications or blood glucose monitoring supplies with the school nurse or, in
the absence of such nurse, with the school administrator.
SECTION 2. That Section 33-520A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-520A. LIFE-THREATENING ALLERGIES IN SCHOOLS -- GUIDELINES, STOCK
SUPPLY OF EPINEPHRINE AUTO-INJECTORS DELIVERY SYSTEMS AND EMERGENCY ADMIN-


ISTRATION. (1) As used in this section, the following definitions shall ap-
ply:
(a) "Administer" means the direct application of an epinephrine auto-
injector delivery system to the body of an individual.
(b) "Designated school personnel" means an employee, agent or vol-
unteer of a school designated by the governing authority of a school
who has completed the training to provide or administer an epinephrine
auto-injector delivery system to a student.
(c) "Epinephrine auto-injector delivery system" means a device that
automatically injects a premeasured dose of epinephrine that is ap-
proved by the federal food and drug administration that contains a
premeasured dose of epinephrine and that is used to administer epineph-
rine into the human body.
(d) "Provide" means the supply of one (1) or more epinephrine auto-in-
jectors delivery systems to an individual.
(e) "School" means any public or nonpublic school.
(f) "Self-administration" means a student or other person's discre-
tionary use of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system, whether
provided by the student or by a school nurse or designated school per-
sonnel pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(2) Any physician, advanced practice registered nurse licensed to pre-
scribe or physician assistant licensed to prescribe pursuant to title 54,
Idaho Code, may prescribe epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems in
the name of a school to be maintained for use in accordance with subsection
(3) of this section. Licensed pharmacists and physicians may dispense epi-
nephrine auto-injectors delivery systems pursuant to a prescription issued
in accordance with this subsection. A school may maintain a stock supply of
epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems.
(3) The governing authority of a school may authorize school nurses and
designated school personnel to do the following:
(a) Provide an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to a student
to self-administer the epinephrine auto-injector delivery system in
accordance with a prescription specific to the student on file with the
school nurse;
(b) Administer an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to a stu-
dent in accordance with a prescription specific to the student on file
with the school nurse; and
(c) Administer an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to any
student or other individual on school premises that the school nurse
or designated school personnel in good faith believes is experiencing
anaphylaxis regardless of whether the student or other individual has a
prescription for an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system.
(4) A school may enter into arrangements with manufacturers of epineph-
rine auto-injectors delivery systems or third-party suppliers of epineph-
rine auto-injectors delivery systems to obtain epinephrine auto-injectors
delivery systems at fair market price, reduced price or free.
(5) The governing authority of a school that participates in supplying
and administering epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems pursuant to
the provisions of this section shall do the following:


(a) Require each school that maintains a stock supply and administers
epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems to submit a report of each
incident at the school or related school event involving a severe al-
lergic reaction or the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector
delivery system to the governing authority of the school or its de-
signee; and
(b) Establish detailed standards for training programs that must be
completed by designated school personnel in order to provide or admin-
ister an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system in accordance with
this section. Such training may be conducted online and, at a minimum,
shall cover:
(i) Techniques on how to recognize symptoms of severe allergic
reactions, including anaphylaxis;
(ii) Standards and procedures for the storage, administration and
disposal of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system; and
(iii) Emergency follow-up procedures.
(6) There shall be no civil liability for any damages for a physician,
advanced practice registered nurse, physician's assistant or pharma-
cist providing a prescription or standing protocol for school epinephrine
auto-injectors delivery systems consistent with the standard of care for
the provider. Further, there shall be no civil liability for damages for
a school or its employees or agents for any injuries that result from the
administration or self-administration of an epinephrine auto-injector
delivery system regardless of whether authorization for use was given by the
student's parents, guardian or medical provider provided the actions taken
in administering or providing the injector epinephrine delivery system
were reasonable under the circumstances. The liability protections in this
section do not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence,
those that are reckless or that constitute willful and wanton behavior. The
liability protections in this section are in addition to any provided under
section 5-330, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.